src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-rishtiing_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - rištīng (roʼvzt): # Noun 212 'eng /est inimesed/fin' - full paradigm
     rištīng+N+Sg+Nom: rištīng
     rištīng+N+Sg+Gen: rištīng
     rištīng+N+Sg+Par: rištīngt
     rištīng+N+Sg+Dat: rištīngõn
     rištīng+N+Sg+Ins: rištīngõks
     rištīng+N+Sg+Ill: rištīngõ
     rištīng+N+Sg+Ela: rištīngst
